test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-xanoTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - хан: # Noun 'sled /(fin) reki' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi ə→o/
     хан+N+Sg+Nom: хан
     хан+N+Sg+Acc: ханмʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Gen: ханʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Dat: хананʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc: ханхана
     хан+N+Sg+Abl: ханхад
     хан+N+Sg+Pros: ханувна
     хан+N+Du+Nom: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom: ханˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Acc: хано
     хан+N+Pl+Gen: ханоˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Dat: ханхаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc: ханхаˮна
     хан+N+Pl+Abl: ханхат
     хан+N+Pl+Pros: ханоˮмана
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ханав, ханув]
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ханав, ханув]
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ханан
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ханхан
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ханханан
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ханхадан
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ханувнан
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ханхаюн
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ханхаюн
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ханхаюн
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ханон
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ханон
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ханоˮн
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ханхаˮн
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ханхаˮнан
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ханхатан
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ханоˮманан
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ханар
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ханамд
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хананд
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ханханд
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ханхананд
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ханхаданд
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ханувнанд
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ханхаюд
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ханхаюд
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ханхают
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ханод
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ханод
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ханот
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ханхат
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ханхаˮнат
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ханхатат
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ханоˮманат
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ханда
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [ханамда, ханмда]
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [хананда, ханнда]
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ханханда
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ханхананда
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ханхаданда
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ханувнанда
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ханхаюда
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ханхаюда
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ханхаюта
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ханода
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ханода
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ханота
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ханхата
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ханхаˮната
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ханхатата, ханхатта]
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ханоˮманата
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ханмиʼ
#     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ханми
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ханмиʼ
#     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ханми
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ханниʼ
#     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ханни
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ханханиʼ
#     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: ханхани
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ханхананиʼ
#     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ханханани
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ханхаданиʼ, ханхадниʼ]
#     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ханхадани, ханхадни]
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ханувнаниʼ
#     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ханувнани
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ханхаюниʼ
#     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: ханхаюни
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ханхаюниʼ
#     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: ханхаюни
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ханхаюниʼ
#     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: ханхаюни
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ханониʼ
#     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ханони
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ханониʼ
#     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ханони
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ханоˮниʼ
#     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ханоˮни
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ханхаˮниʼ
#     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: ханхаˮни
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ханхаˮнаниʼ
#     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: ханхаˮнани
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ханхатаниʼ, ханхатниʼ]
#     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ханхатани, ханхатни]
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ханоˮмананиʼ
#     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: ханоˮманани
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ханриʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: [ханамдиʼ, ханмдиʼ]
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: [ханандиʼ, ханндиʼ]
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ханхандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ханханандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ханхадандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ханувнандиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ханхаютиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ханодиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ханодиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ханотиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ханхатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ханхаˮнатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ханхататиʼ, ханхаттиʼ]
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ханоˮманатиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: [ханамдиʼ, ханмдиʼ]
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: [ханандиʼ, ханндиʼ]
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ханхандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ханханандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ханхадандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ханувнандиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ханхаютиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ханодиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ханодиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ханотиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ханхатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ханхаˮнатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ханхататиʼ, ханхаттиʼ]
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ханоˮманатиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ханваˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ханваˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ханнаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ханханаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ханхананаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ханхаданаˮ, ханхаднаˮ]
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ханувнанаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ханонаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ханонаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ханоˮнаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ханхаˮнаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ханхаˮнанаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ханхатанаˮ, ханхатнаˮ]
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ханоˮмананаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ханраˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: [ханамдаˮ, ханмдаˮ]
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: [ханандаˮ, ханндаˮ]
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ханхандаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ханханандаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ханхадандаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ханувнандаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ханхаюдаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ханхаюдаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ханхаютаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ханодаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ханодаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ханотаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ханхатаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ханхаˮнатаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ханхататаˮ, ханхаттаˮ]
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ханоˮманатаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: [ханамдоʼ, ханмдоʼ]
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: [ханандоʼ, ханндоʼ]
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ханхандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ханханандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ханхадандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ханувнандоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ханхаюдоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ханхаюдоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ханхаютоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ханодоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ханодоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ханотоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ханхатоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ханхаˮнатоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ханхататоʼ, ханхаттоʼ]
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ханоˮманатоʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Abs: ханад
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хандав, хандув]
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хандав, хандув]
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: хандан
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хандар
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хандамд
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ханданд
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: хандада
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хандамда
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ханданда
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: хандамиʼ
#     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: хандами
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: хандамиʼ
#     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: хандами
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ханданиʼ
#     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: хандани
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: хандариʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хандамдиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хандандиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: хандадиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хандамдиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хандандиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: хандаваˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: хандаваˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ханданаˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: хандараˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хандамдаˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хандандаˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: хандадоʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: хандамдоʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: хандандоʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ханадмʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ханан
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хан
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ханниʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хандиʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ханваˮ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хандаˮ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханˮ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хандамзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ханнась
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханась
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ханнинзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хандинзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханханзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ханваць
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хандаць
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханаць
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [ханав, ханув]
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ханар
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ханда
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ханмиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ханриʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ханваˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ханраˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханвась
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханрась
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хандась
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханминзь
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханринзь
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хандинзь
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханваць
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханраць
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хандонзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюн
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюд
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюда
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюниʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюдаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаюдоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюнась
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюдась
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюдась
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюнинзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюдинзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюдинзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюнаць
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюдаць
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханхаюдонзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханон
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханод
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханода
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханониʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханодиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханодиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханонаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханодаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханодоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханонась
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханодась
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханодась
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханонинзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханодинзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханодинзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханонаць
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханодаць
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханодонзь
     хан+N+Tra: ханӈэ
     хан+N+Car: хансиˮ
     хан+N+Equ: хандаремʼ
     хан+N+Equ+Lat: хандаревʼ
